Hawaii statutes.
§188-35 Fishing in certain waters.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful for any
person to fish in or take aquatic life from the waters:

(1) Of the Waikiki reclamation canal, Oahu;

(2) Of the drainage canal constructed in connection
with Kapiolani Boulevard, Oahu;

(3) Of the Kapalama drainage canal, Oahu;

(4) Off Heeia-Kea wharf, Oahu;

(5) Within that portion of Waialua Bay delineated on
the seaward boundary by lines drawn one hundred yards seaward of and parallel
to the Haleiwa Harbor Breakwater and one hundred yards seaward of and parallel
to the Haleiwa Beach Groin including the extension to the intercept of these
lines and the inland boundary consisting of a line drawn ten yards downstream
of and parallel to the Anahulu Bridge, Oahu;

(6) Within that portion of Pokai Bay including the
Pokai Boat Harbor and the Waianae Small Boat Harbor delineated on the seaward
boundary by a straight line drawn from Kaneilio Point to Lahilahi Point with
the northwestern boundary to be delineated by a straight line extending from
the southernmost tip of the point immediately seaward of Waianae High School on
a southwest azimuth to the intercept of the seaward boundary extending from
Kaneilio Point to Lahilahi Point, Oahu; and

(7) Of the Kapaa and Waikaea canals, Kauai.

(b) With reference to any of the places or
areas named above, any person may, subject to applicable laws and rules, fish
with one line, or one rod and line, provided the line shall not have more than
two hooks; or may take crabs with not more than ten nets, provided the nets
shall not exceed two feet in diameter; or may take shrimps for bait purposes
only with a hand net, provided the net shall not exceed three feet in any
dimension; provided that in the Waikiki reclamation canal any person may take
up to fifty tabai or mosquito fish, or o‘opu akupa, or tilapia or any
combination thereof, per day, for noncommercial purposes only, with a single
small mesh net, provided that the net including any handle and other attachment
thereto shall not exceed three feet in any dimension.

(c) An owner or operator of a fishpond may
take pua or other small fish, using nets, with a license obtained from the
department of land and natural resources and under rules the department may
adopt, for the purpose of stocking the fishpond.

(d) Commercial marine licensees, with a
license from the department of land and natural resources, may take nehu, iao,
or any other species of baitfish as authorized by section 188-45, using nets
for bait purposes only.

(e) The department may issue licenses at its
discretion and at any time may revoke any or all licenses when, in its
judgment, the action is necessary to preserve the stock of fish in the canals
or waters. [L 1923, c 41, §§1, 2; RL 1925, §770; RL 1935, §384; am L 1943, c
26, §1 and c 195, §§1, 2; RL 1945, §1231; am L 1947, c 19, §1; am L 1949, c
154, §1; am L 1951, c 58, §1; am L 1955, c 118, §1; RL 1955, §21-68; am L 1957,
c 230, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 29, §1 and c 132, §2; HRS
§188-35; am L 1974, c 169, §1; am L 1978, c 164, §1; am L 1979, c 38, §1; am L
1981, c 85, §44; am L 1983, c 145, §1; am L 1987, c 21, §1; am L 1989, c 101,
§1; am L 1993, c 80, §1]

Cross References

Rulemaking, see
chapter 91.

Law Journals and Reviews

Protecting Hawai‘i's
Fisheries: Creating an Effective Regulatory Scheme to Sustain Hawai‘i's Fish
Stocks. 29 UH L. Rev. 243.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next